Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 8
APPEALS

11-109-801. Appeals procedure.

Any trust company aggrieved and directly affected by an order or rule of the banking board, issued under this article, may seek a review in the district court of this state in and for the county in which the trust company is located, within thirty days after receipt of written notice of the issuance of such order or rule. The filing of such a petition for review shall not, of itself, stay enforcement of an order or rule, but the court, upon a finding that irreparable injury would otherwise result, may order a stay upon such terms as it deems proper. The court may affirm the order of the banking board or may direct said banking board to take any action deemed proper. No person shall be subjected to any civil or criminal liability for any act or omission made in good faith reliance upon a then existing order or rule of the banking board, notwithstanding a subsequent decision by a court invalidating the order or rule.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1202, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-120 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-802. Injunctions - appeals.

Whenever the banking board has taken possession of a trust company and the trust company deems itself aggrieved thereby, such trust company, within ten days after such taking, may apply to the court in which notice of possession has been filed to enjoin further proceedings. After citing the banking board to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after a hearing, the court may dismiss the application of the trust company or may enjoin the banking board from further liquidation proceedings and direct the banking board to surrender possession of the trust company.

An appeal may be taken by the banking board or by the trust company from the judgment of the court in the manner provided by law for appeals from judgments of the district court. An appeal from the judgment does not operate as a stay of judgment. If the appeal is taken by the banking board, no bond need be given, but if the appeal is taken by the trust company, a bond shall be given as required by the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1202, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-123 as it existed prior to 2003.